New York, session 2025-2026, S5287.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The correction law is amended by adding a new section 608 2 to read as follows: 3 § 608. Home confinement authority. 1. For purposes of this section, 4 "covered emergency period" shall mean the period beginning on the date 5 on which a state disaster emergency has been declared by the governor 6 pursuant to article two-B of the executive law and ending on the date 7 that is thirty days after the date on which such state disaster emergen- 8 cy has been lifted. 9 2. During a covered emergency period, if the commissioner shall deter- 10 mine that emergency conditions will materially affect the functioning of 11 the department, the commissioner shall have the authority to place any 12 incarcerated individual in home confinement for a period of time that 13 the commissioner deems appropriate. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09892-01-5